Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 10.1-1186.
General powers of the Department.

The Department shall have the following general powers, any of which the Director may delegate as appropriate:

Employ such personnel as may be required to carry out the duties of the Department;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other states, other state agencies and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

Accept grants from the United States government and agencies and instrumentalities thereof and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable;

Accept and administer services, property, gifts and other funds donated to the Department;

Implement all regulations as may be adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, and the Virginia Waste Management Board;

Administer, under the direction of the Boards, funds appropriated to it for environmental programs and make contracts related thereto;

Advise and coordinate the responses of state agencies to notices of proceedings by the State Water Control Board to consider certifications of hydropower projects under 33 U.S.C. § 1341;

Advise interested agencies of the Commonwealth of pending proceedings when the Department of Environmental Quality intervenes directly on behalf of the Commonwealth in a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission proceeding or when the Department of Wildlife Resources intervenes in a Federal Energy Regulatory Commission proceeding to coordinate the provision of information and testimony for use in the proceedings;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law and to the extent consistent with federal requirements, following a proceeding as provided in § 2.2-4019, issue special orders to any person to comply with: (i) the provisions of any law administered by the Boards, the Director or the Department, (ii) any condition of a permit or a certification, (iii) any regulations of the Boards, or (iv) any case decision, as defined in § 2.2-4001, of the Boards or Director. The issuance of a special order shall be considered a case decision as defined in § 2.2-4001. The Director shall not delegate his authority to impose civil penalties in conjunction with issuance of special orders. For purposes of this subdivision, “Boards” means the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, and the Virginia Waste Management Board; and

Perform all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1992, c. 887; 1996, c. 1005; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 826 and 827, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall identify the owner or operator of any combined sewer overflow (CSO) outfall that discharges into the Chesapeake Bay Watershed.

“§ 2. For any owner or operator not under a state order or decree related to the CSO as of January 1, 2017, DEQ shall, by July 1, 2018, determine what actions by the owner or operator are necessary to bring the CSO outfall into compliance with Virginia law, the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), and the Presumption Approach described in the CSO Control Policy adopted by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) at 59 F.R. 18688, unless a higher level of control is necessary to comply with a Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL), and shall inform the owner or operator of the actions necessary.

“§ 3. Any owner of a CSO outfall that discharges into the Chesapeake Bay Watershed not under a state order or decree related to the CSO as of January 1, 2017, shall, by July 1, 2023, initiate construction activities necessary to bring the CSO outfall into compliance and shall, by July 1, 2025, bring the CSO outfall into compliance with Virginia law, the federal Clean Water Act, and the Presumption Approach described in the EPA CSO Control Policy, unless a higher level of control is necessary to comply with a TMDL.

“§ 4. Any owner of a CSO outfall that discharges into the Chesapeake Bay Watershed not under a state order or decree related to the CSO as of January 1, 2017, shall report annually to DEQ on its progress pursuant to § 3. No later than January 1 of each year, DEQ shall transmit, with any additional information the Director of DEQ determines to be appropriate, the CSO outfall progress reports to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources; the Virginia delegation to the Chesapeake Bay Commission; the Secretary of Natural Resources; and the Governor.”

Acts 2020, c. 405, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall convene a stakeholder advisory group for the purpose of studying the planting or preservation of trees as an urban land cover type and as a stormwater best management practice (BMP).

“§ 2. The stakeholder advisory group shall be composed of representatives of the residential and commercial development and construction industry, the community associations industry, the linear infrastructure development industry, the Virginia Forestry Association, and local Virginia stormwater management program authorities; professional environmental technical experts; and other technical experts whom DEQ deems necessary.

“§ 3. Technical assistance shall be provided to DEQ by the Department of Forestry and the Department of Conservation and Recreation. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to DEQ for this study, upon request.

“§ 4. The Department of Environmental Quality shall publish on its website a report containing the findings of the stakeholder advisory group by November 1, 2020, and shall include in the report a recommendation as to whether the planting or preservation of trees shall be deemed a creditable land cover type or BMP and, if so, how much credit shall be given for its optional use. The Department of Environmental Quality shall, before the first day of the 2021 Session of the General Assembly, report the findings of the stakeholder advisory group to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources.”

Acts 2020, c. 624 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) shall convene a work group to discuss the issue of the disposal of construction fill and debris on rural lands. The work group shall include representatives of DEQ, the Department of Forestry, the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Virginia Department of Transportation, nonprofit environmental organizations, the waste disposal industry, the trucking industry, the Virginia Chapter of the American Planning Association, the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation, the Virginia Agribusiness Council, the Virginia Association of Counties, the Home Builders Association of Virginia, the road construction industry, and the Virginia Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts. The work group shall discuss (i) the need of road construction and development projects to dispose of dirt in a cost-effective manner; (ii) the practice of rural landowners charging a fee to allow the use of their lands as disposal sites; (iii) the extent of monitoring for possible contaminants or effects on groundwater when dirt and rubble is deposited on agricultural fields; (iv) the adequacy of existing state and local enforcement remedies against responsible land disturbers disposing of dirt in unauthorized or unapproved locations; and (v) the use of rural roads by dump trucks traveling to disposal sites and any effects of such travel, including road damage, traffic congestion, noise, and the loss of a portion of the dirt during transit in the form of dust or mud. The work group shall consider recommending (a) changes to guidance or regulations for agencies having the authority to regulate activities associated with the work group’s work, including recommendations regarding a model ordinance for adoption by localities, and (b) statutory changes, including changes related to agricultural engineering operations and construction of terraces as those terms are used in the State Water Control Law (§ 62.1-44.2 et seq. of the Code of Virginia). The work group shall report its recommendations to the Director of DEQ, the State Forester, the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, and the Commissioner of the Department of Transportation by December 1, 2020. The work group also may provide any recommendations to the Virginia Municipal League and the Virginia Association of Counties.”

Acts 2020, c. 634 provides: “§ 1. That the owner or operator of any combined sewer overflow (CSO) system east of Charlottesville that discharges into the James River watershed shall submit to the Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) the following:

“A. By July 1, 2021, an interim plan detailing all known actions the owner or operator can initiate by July 1, 2022, to address the requirements of any consent special order issued by the State Water Control Board (the Board) to the owner or operator regarding the CSO system; and

“B. By July 1, 2024, a final plan updating the interim plan and detailing all actions the owner or operator will take to satisfy all requirements of any consent special order issued by the Board to the owner or operator regarding the CSO system.

“Both the interim plan and the final plan shall be divided into discrete projects or phases that may be planned or constructed individually or in combination and shall include for each project or phase (i) an estimated timeline from the start of detailed planning to completion of construction, (ii) an estimated cost, (iii) the projected resultant water quality improvements, and (iv) proposed funding sources. The owner or operator, subject to Department approval, may substitute for any proposed action in either the interim or final plan an alternative action or actions to address the requirements of any consent special order issued by the Board to the owner or operator regarding the CSO system, provided that such alternative is at least as cost-effective as the original proposed action. The Department shall assist the owner or operator in developing both the interim plan and the final plan and in identifying available sources of funding and financing.

“§ 2. Any such owner or operator of a CSO system shall:

“A. By July 1, 2022, initiate construction and related activities pursuant to the interim plan required in subsection A of § 1;

“B. By July 1, 2025, initiate construction and related activities pursuant to the final plan required in subsection B of § 1;

“C. By July 1, 2027, complete construction and related activities pursuant to the interim plan required in subsection A of § 1;

“D. By July 1, 2030, identify any additional action that is applicable to the owner or operator of a CSO system and is necessary to meet, by 2036, the requirements of the total maximum daily load (TMDL) for bacterial impairments of the James River and its tributaries in the Richmond area, as described in the implementation plan for such TMDL issued by the Department in 2011; and

“E. By July 1, 2035, complete construction and related activities pursuant to the final plan required in subsection B of § 1.

“§ 3. Any such owner or operator of a CSO system shall report annuall Department on its progress pursuant to § 1 and § 2, with the first annual report due no later than December 1, 2020, and the final annual report due after completion of (i) the construction activities pursuant to the final plan required in subsection B of § 1 and (ii) additional actions identified in subsection D of § 2. The report, which may be included as part of any annual report required under a consent special order issued by the Department to the owner or operator regarding the CSO system, shall include information on the level and sources of funding and financing such owner or operator has applied to the CSO system in each of the past five fiscal years, as well an assessment of funding needs in future years with a request that appropriation amounts sufficient to carry out the purposes of this act be included in the budget bill. No later than January 1 of each year, the Department shall transmit, with any additional information the Director of the Department determines to be appropriate, the CSO system progress reports to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources; the Virginia delegation to the Chesapeake Bay Commission; the Secretary of Natural Resources; and the Governor. The Department may recommend extending the deadlines in § 2 to allow adaptive management by the owner or operator due to a natural disaster or other act of God, or because of a lack of available funding and financing.

“§ 4. The Governor shall take into account the reports required in §/ the preparation of the biennial budget bill and subsequent amendments thereto. The General Assembly may take such reports into account in enacting the general appropriation act and may evaluate the feasibility of the deadlines in § 2 on a biennial basis beginning in 2022 and modify such deadlines as necessary, taking into account any potential adverse effects on (i) the owner’s or operator’s bond rating; (ii) the utility rates, fees, or charges assessed by the owner or operator; (iii) any environmental justice community, or owner’s or operator’s customers living below the federal poverty level; or (iv) any other relevant aspect of the owner’s or operator’s operations. No sooner than July 1, 2025, and no more frequently than every two years thereafter, the owner or operator may petition the Board for, and the Board may grant, an extension to one or more of the deadlines in § 2 if the Board determines that (a) the General Assembly has not extended such deadline and (b) funding sufficient to meet such deadline has not been secured and the owner or operator has exhausted all reasonable options for securing such funding.

“§ 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 1 or § 2, no such owner of a CSO system shall be prohibited from seeking modifications to a consent special order with the concurrence of the Department and the Board if alternative actions for protecting water quality are determined to be more cost-effective.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 79, are identical, and deleted subsection 7, which read: “Initiate and supervise programs designed to educate citizens on ecology, pollution and its control, technology and its relationship to environmental problems and their solutions, population and its relation to environmental problems, and other matters concerning environmental quality” and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subdivision 8.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Consent orders. —

There is nothing in §

10.1-1186

that specifically gives the Director of the Virginia Department of Environmental Quality the authority to enter into a consent order but that authority is implied from the express authority to issue a special order; just as the Director has authority to settle a matter and enter into a consent order by virtue of his §

10.1-1186

authority to issue special orders without consent, so does the State Air Pollution Control Board have authority to settle a matter and enter into or approve a consent order by virtue of its order and enforcement authority under subsection D of §

10.1-1307

and §

10.1-1309

. Mirant Potomac River, L.L.C. v. State Air Pollution Control Bd., 75 Va. Cir. 117, 2008 Va. Cir. LEXIS 220 (Richmond Mar. 13, 2008).

§ 10.1-1186.01.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Reimbursements to localities for upgrades to treatment works.

As used in this section, “Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program” or “ENRC Program” means the same as that term is defined in § 62.1-44.19:13.

The General Assembly shall fund grants to finance the reasonable costs of design and installation of nutrient removal technology at the publicly owned treatment works designated as significant dischargers contained in subsection F or as eligible nonsignificant dischargers as defined in §

10.1-2117

. When grant disbursements pursuant to this section reach a sum sufficient to fund the completion of the ENRC Program at all publicly owned treatment works, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations shall review (i) the future funding needs to meet the purposes of the Water Quality Improvement Act, (ii) the most recent annual needs estimate required by §

10.1-2134.1

, and (iii) the appropriate funding mechanism for such needs.

The disbursement of grants for the design and installation of nutrient removal technology at those publicly owned treatment works included in subsection F and eligible nonsignificant dischargers shall be made monthly based on a requisition submitted by the grant recipient in the form requested by the Department. Each requisition shall include written certification that the applicable local share of the cost of nutrient removal technology for that portion of the project covered by such requisition has been incurred or expended. Except as may otherwise be approved by the Department, disbursements shall not exceed 95 percent of the total grant amount until satisfactory completion of the project. The distribution of the grants shall be effected by one of the following methods:

In payments to be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Water Quality Improvement Fund pursuant to §

10.1-2131

;

Over a specified time through a contractual agreement entered into by the Treasury Board and approved by the Governor, on behalf of the Commonwealth, and the locality or public service authority undertaking the design and installation of nutrient removal technology, such payments to be paid by the State Treasurer out of funds appropriated to the Treasury Board; or

In payments to be paid by the State Treasurer upon request of the Director out of proceeds from bonds issued by the Virginia Public Building Authority, in consultation with the Department, pursuant to §§ 2.2-2261, 2.2-2263, and 2.2-2264, including the Commonwealth’s share of the interest costs expended by the locality or regional authority for financing such project during the period from 50 percent completion of construction to final completion of construction.

The General Assembly has the sole authority to determine whether disbursement shall be made pursuant to subdivision C 1, 2, or 3, or a combination thereof, provided that a disbursement shall be made pursuant to subdivision C 3 only upon a certification by the Department that project grant reimbursements for the fiscal year will exceed the available funds in the Water Quality Improvement Fund.

Exclusive of any deposits made pursuant to §

10.1-2128

, the grants awarded pursuant to this section shall include such appropriations as provided from time to time in the appropriation act or any amendments thereto.

The disbursement of grants to finance the costs of design and installation of nutrient removal technology, including eligible design and installation costs for implementation of the ENRC Program, at the following listed publicly owned treatment works and other eligible nonsignificant dischargers shall be provided pursuant to the distribution methodology included in §

10.1-2131

. The notation “WIP3-N” or “WIP3-P” indicates that a facility is subject to additional requirements for total nitrogen or total phosphorus, respectively, under the ENRC Program. In no case shall any publicly owned treatment works receive a grant of less than 35 percent of the costs of the design and installation of nutrient removal technology.

Click to view

To the extent that any publicly owned treatment works receives less than the grant specified pursuant to §

10.1-2131

, any year-end revenue surplus or unappropriated balances deposited in the Water Quality Improvement Fund, as required by §

10.1-2128

, shall be prioritized in order to augment the funding of those projects for which grants have been prorated. Any additional reimbursements to these prorated projects shall not exceed the total reimbursement amount due pursuant to the formula established in subsection E of §

10.1-2131

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of §

10.1-2131

, the Director shall not be required to enter into a grant agreement with a facility designated as a significant discharger or eligible nonsignificant discharger if the Director determines that the use of nutrient credits in accordance with the Chesapeake Bay Watershed Nutrient Credit Exchange Program (§ 62.1-44.19:12 et seq.) would be significantly more cost-effective than the installation of nutrient controls for the facility in question.

FACILITY NAME OWNER Shenandoah - Potomac River Basin ACSA-Fishersville STP Augusta County Service Authority Luray STP Town of Luray ACSA-Middle River Regional STP Augusta County Service Authority HRRSA-North River WWTF WIP3-P Harrisonburg-Rockingham Regional Sewer Authority ACSA-Stuarts Draft STP Augusta County Service Authority Waynesboro STP City of Waynesboro ACSA-Weyers Cave STP Augusta County Service Authority Berryville STP Town of Berryville Front Royal STP Town of Front Royal Mount Jackson STP Town of Mount Jackson New Market STP Town of New Market Shenandoah Co.-North Fork Regional Shenandoah County WWTP Stoney Creek Sanitary District STP Stoney Creek Sanitary District Strasburg STP Town of Strasburg Woodstock STP Town of Woodstock FWSA-Opequon Water Reclamation Frederick-Winchester Service Facility Authority FWSA-Parkins Mill WWTF Frederick-Winchester Service Authority Purcellville-Basham Simms WWTF Town of Purcellville LCSA-Broad Run WRF Loudoun County Service Authority Leesburg WPCF Town of Leesburg Round Hill WWTP Town of Round Hill PWCSA-H.L. Mooney WWTF Prince William County Service Authority Upper Occoquan Sewage Authority Upper Occoquan Sewage Authority WWTP FCW&SA-Vint Hill WWTF Fauquier County Water and Sewer Authority Alexandria Sanitation Authority WWTP Alexandria Sanitation Authority Arlington Co. WPCF Arlington County Fairfax Co. Noman-Cole Fairfax County Pollution Control Facility Stafford Co.-Aquia WWTP Stafford County Colonial Beach STP Town of Colonial Beach Dahlgren Sanitary District WWTP King George County Service Authority Fairview Beach STP King George County Service Authority Purkins Corner WWTP King George County Service Authority District of Columbia - Blue Plains STP Loudoun County Service Authority (Virginia portion) and Fairfax County contract for capacity Rappahannock River Basin Culpeper WWTP Town of Culpeper Marshall WWTP Town of Marshall Mountain Run WWTP Culpeper County Orange STP Town of Orange Rapidan STP Rapidan Service Authority FCW&SA-Remmington WWTP Fauquier County Water and Sewer Authority Warrenton STP Town of Warrenton Wilderness Shores WWTP Rapidan Service Authority Spotsylvania Co.-FMC WWTF Spotsylvania County Fredericksburg WWTF City of Fredericksburg WIP3-N, WIP3-P Stafford Co.-Little Falls Run WWTF Stafford County Spotsylvania Co.-Massaponax WWTF Spotsylvania County WIP3-N, WIP3-P Spotsylvania County Montross-Westmoreland WWTP Westmoreland County Oakland Park STP King George County Service Authority Tappahannock WWTP Town of Tappahannock Urbanna WWTP Hampton Roads Sanitation District Warsaw STP Town of Warsaw Reedville Sanitary District WWTP Reedville Sanitary District 60 Kilmarnock WWTP Town of Kilmarnock York River Basin Caroline Co. Regional STP Caroline County Gordonsville STP Rapidan Service Authority Ashland WWTP Hanover County Doswell WWTP Hanover County HRSD-York River STP WIP3-N Hampton Roads Sanitation District Parham Landing WWTP New Kent County Totopotomoy WWTP Hanover County HRSD-West Point STP Hampton Roads Sanitation District HRSD-Mathews Courthouse STP Hampton Roads Sanitation District Spotsylvania Co.-Thornburg STP Spotsylvania County WIP3-N, WIP3-P James River Basin Buena Vista STP City of Buena Vista Covington STP City of Covington Lexington-Rockbridge Regional WQCF Maury Service Authority Alleghany Co.-Low Moor STP Alleghany County Alleghany Co.-Lower Jackson River Alleghany County WWTP Amherst-Rutledge Creek WWTP Town of Amherst Lynchburg STP City of Lynchburg RWSA-Moores Creek Regional STP Rivanna Water and Sewer Authority Crewe WWTP Town of Crew Farmville WWTP Town of Farmville Chesterfield Co.-Falling Chesterfield County Creek WWTP Henrico Co. WWTP Henrico County Hopewell Regional WWTF City of Hopewell Chesterfield Co.-Proctors Creek WWTP Chesterfield County Richmond WWTP City of Richmond South Central Wastewater South Central Wastewater Authority WWTF WIP3-N, WIP3-P Authority HRSD-Boat Harbor STP WIP3-N, Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-P District HRSD-James River STP WIP3-N, Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-P District HRSD-Williamsburg STP WIP3-N, Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-P District HRSD-Nansemond STP WIP3-N, Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-P District HRSD-Army Base STP WIP3-N, Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-P District HRSD-Virginia Initiative Plant STP Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-N, WIP3-P District HRSD-Chesapeake/Elizabeth STP Hampton Roads Sanitation WIP3-N, WIP3-P District Eastern Shore Basin Cape Charles WWTP Town of Cape Charles Onancock WWTP Town of Onancock Tangier Island WWTP Town of Tangier

History.

2007, cc. 851, 900; 2008, c. 572; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363, 364.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 851 and 900, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality shall identify and evaluate options to ensure the efficient use of any grants authorized by the Water Quality Improvement Act (§

10.1-2117

et seq. of the Code of Virginia). Any grant issued after October 1, 2007, shall include policies and guidelines governing the use of such grants that include the enforcement of appropriate cost control measures for the use of the grants. The Department shall work with representatives from local governments and the conservation community to evaluate the optimal use of existing and potential cost control measures, including but not limited to (i) evaluation of eligible and appropriate costs, (ii) applicability of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§ 2.2-4300 et seq. of the Code of Virginia), (iii) voluntary nutrient credit trading, (iv) basing grant amounts on facility optimization using full life-cycle cost evaluation, (v) the ability to limit or exclude reimbursements based upon a comparison of costs to upgrade or build versus the purchase of credits, and (vi) the ability to prioritize grant agreements based upon the river-basin optimization plans.
Such policies and procedures shall be developed no later than October 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, cc 851 and 900, cl. 3 provides: “That based upon a determination by the General Assembly pursuant to subsection C of §

10.1-1186.01

of the Code of Virginia to distribute the grants for the design and installation of nutrient removal technology at publicly owned treatment works designated as significant dischargers or as eligible nonsignificant dischargers as defined in §

10.1-2117

of the Code of Virginia through the use of bonds as provided for in subdivision B 3 of §

10.1-1186.01

, the Virginia Public Building Authority is authorized to fund certain Water Quality Improvement Grants through the issuance of bonds as follows:

“§ 1. Pursuant to §§ 2.2-2261, 2.2-2263, and 2.2-2264 of the Code of Virginia, the Virginia Public Building Authority is hereby authorized to finance certain Virginia Water Quality Improvement Grants pursuant to Article 4 (§

10.1-2128

et seq.) of Chapter 21.1 of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia, through the issuance of bonds, without limitation and together with other available funds. Such grants shall be used exclusively to fund a portion of some or all of the acquisition, design, construction, installation, equipping, improvement, or renovation of nutrient removal technology for significant dischargers contained in § 2 of this enactment and eligible nonsignificant dischargers as defined in §

10.1-2117

of the Code of Virginia.

“§ 2. The Virginia Public Building Authority is authorized to take any and all necessary, proper, or convenient steps and to exercise any and all powers granted to it by law to carry out the undertaking and financing contemplated by the provisions of this enactment, including the power to finance grants to fund a portion of the costs of any or all of the projects set forth in this act by the issuance of revenue bonds from time to time in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $250 million, plus amounts needed to fund issuance costs, reserve funds, original issue discount, and other financing expenses.

“§ 3. The net proceeds of Virginia Public Building Authority bonds shall finance Virginia Water Quality Improvement Grants to fund or reimburse approved capital costs for each such project as and to the extent determined by the Department of Environmental Quality pursuant to the provisions of this enactment and of Article 4 (§

10.1-2128

et seq.) of Chapter 21.1 of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia, including but not limited to the qualifications of projects for Virginia Water Quality Improvement Grants as set forth in §§

10.1-2129

,

10.1-2130

, and

10.1-2131

and in written guidelines developed by the Secretary of Natural Resources in accordance with §

10.1-2129

. Bond proceeds may not be used to pay debt service on obligations of regional or local governments or authorities. A separate account shall be maintained for the grants under this enactment and for bonds issued to finance such grants. Upon certification to the Authority by the Department of Environmental Quality that a project qualifies for a grant under the provisions of this act and the provisions of Article 4 (§

10.1-2128

et seq.) of Chapter 21.1 of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia and of the proposed amount and purpose of such grant, the Authority shall cause the disbursement of bond proceeds to fund such grant, but only to the extent of available funds therefore.

“§ 4. The proceeds of such bonds are hereby appropriated for disbursement from the state treasury pursuant to Article X, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia, and § 2.2-1819 of the Code of Virginia. Grants funded with proceeds of the bonds will be deposited in a separate account in the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund, pursuant to §

10.1-2128

of the Code of Virginia, which authorizes such Fund to consist of such other sums as may be made available to it from any other source, public or private. The general conditions and general provisions of a general appropriation act enacted by the General Assembly, in effect from time to time, and all of the terms and conditions contained therein shall apply to the capital projects listed in this act.

“§ 5. No bonds authorized pursuant to this enactment shall be issued prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2007, cc. 851 and 900, cl. 5 provides: “That all bonds issued heretofore by the Virginia Public Building Authority to provide funds to pay for all or any portion of the cost of one or more projects or portion thereof are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 4 provides: “That if the Secretary of Natural and Historic
Resources (the Secretary) determines on or after July 1, 2026, that the Commonwealth has not achieved, or in the event of increased nutrient loads associated with climate change will not be able to maintain, its nitrogen pollution reduction commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan, the Secretary may develop an additional watershed implementation plan or plans pursuant to § 2.2-218 of the Code of Virginia. Any such plan shall take into consideration the progress made by all point and nonpoint sources toward meeting applicable load and waste load allocations, the best available science and water quality modeling, and any applicable U.S. Environmental Protection Agency guidance for Chesapeake Bay TMDL implementation. In any such plan, the Secretary may include as priority projects upgrades with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L annual average total nitrogen concentration at municipal wastewater treatment facilities with a design capacity greater than 10.0 MGD discharging to James River Segment JMSTF2 so long as (i) the scheduled date for compliance is January 1, 2036; (ii) notwithstanding the wasteload allocations specified in clause (iii), compliance requires operating the nutrient removal technology to achieve an annual average total nitrogen concentration of less than or equal to 4.0 mg/L or, until such time as the facility is upgraded to achieve such concentration, the option of achieving an equivalent discharged load based on an annual average total nitrogen concentration of 4.0 mg/L and actual annual flow treated, including the use of point source nitrogen credits; and (iii) the facilities have and retain the following total nitrogen waste load allocations: Falling Creek WWTP (182,738 lbs/year), Proctors Creek WWTP (411,151 lbs/year and, in the event that Proctors Creek WWTP is expanded in accordance with 9VAC25-40-70 and Falling Creek WWTP is upgraded to achieve 4.0 mg/L, 493,391 lbs/year), and Henrico County WWTP (1,142,085 lbs/year). If the Secretary opts to include such facilities in the plan, the State Water Control Board shall include the foregoing concentrations limits, waste load allocations, and schedules for compliance in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation, the Watershed General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, and individual VPDES permits, as applicable.”

Acts
2022, cc. 127 and
128, cl. 2 provides: “That the nutrient technology requirements of 3.0 mg/L total nitrogen and 0.22 mg/L total phosphorus for the Fredericksburg Waste Water Treatment Facility established in the first enactment clause of this act shall take effect and apply on an annual basis when the expanded Fredericksburg Waste Water Treatment Facility receives its certificate to operate.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 572, in subsection B, substituted “monthly based on a requisition submitted by the grant recipient in the form requested by the Department” for “as follows: (i) the first phase of a grant shall be disbursed upon written certification that 25% of the local share of the cost of nutrient removal technology for the project has been expended; (ii) the second phase upon written certification that 50% of the local share of the cost of nutrient removal technology for the project has been expended; (iii) the third phase upon written certification that 75% of the local share of the cost of the nutrient removal technology for the project has been expended; and (iv) the final phase upon written certification that 100% of the local share of the cost of the construction, expansion, or upgrade of nutrient removal technology for the project has been expended” in the first sentence and inserted the present third and fourth sentences.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 127 and 128 are identical, and substituted “Fredericksburg WWTF WIP3-N, WIP3-P” for “Fredericksburg WWTF” in subsection F in the list after the introductory paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).